Hawaii, session 2025, GM1415.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION I. The legislature finds that in the aftermath of
the 2023 Maui wildfires, the department of the attorney general
initiated an investigation and retained the independent,
third-party Fire Safety Research Institute, part of UL Research
Institutes, to assess the performance of state and county
agencies in preparing for and responding to the 2023 Maui
wildfires. The investigation led to three reports -- a
"Phase 1" comprehensive timeline report, a "Phase 2" incident
analysis report, and a "Phase 3" forward-looking report.
The "Phase 3" forward-looking report organized these
findings and provided a prioritized list of action items of
changes to be made to improve Hawaii's response to wildfires for
the State and all counties. The report calls for changes and
improvements to the office of the state fire marshal, which was
established by Act 209, Session Laws of Hawaii 2024 — among
them, bolstering statutory authority of the office of the state
fire marshal to address the wide spectrum of fire safety issues.
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO
■iiiiiMiiHiiiiiiiniigH

Page 2 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
delineating responsibilities and reporting structures between
the state fire marshal and the state fire council, and creating
an organizational structure to immediately address the State's
fire-safety priorities effectively.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Effectuate the recommendations of the "Phase 3"
forward-looking report;
(2) Establish a state fire marshal selection commission;
and
(3) Place the office of the state fire marshal under the
department of law enforcement.
SECTION 2. Chapter 132, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by designating sections 132-1 to 132-19 as part I and
inserting a title before section 132-1 to read as follows:
"PART I. GENERAL PROVISIONS"
SECTION 3. Chapter 132, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new part to be appropriately designated and
to read as follows:
"PART OFFICE OF THE STATE FIRE MARSHAL
§132-A Definitions. As used in this part:
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO


Page 3 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
"Defensible space" means a natural or human-made area in
which material capable of supporting the spread of fire has been
treated, cleared, or modified to slow the rate and intensity of
advancing wildfires and allowing space for fire suppression
operations to occur.
"Office" means the office of the state fire marshal.
"Structure hardening" means the installation, replacement,
or retrofitting of building materials, systems, or assemblies
used in the exterior design and construction of existing
structures with the primary purpose of reducing risk to
structures from wildfire and in compliance with the provisions
of the state fire code relating to structure or home hardening.
§132-B Office of the state fire marshal; established. (a)
The office of the state fire marshal shall be established within
the department of law enforcement for administrative purposes.
The office shall be headed by the state fire marshal.
(b) The state fire marshal may organize and reorganize the
administrative structure of the office as the state fire marshal
considers appropriate to properly conduct the work of the
office.
2025-3442 HB1064 GDI HMSO

Page 4 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(c) The state fire marshal may divide the functions of the
office into administrative divisions. The state fire marshal
may appoint an individual to administer each division. Each
individual appointed under this subsection shall be well-
qualified by technical training and experience in the functions
to be performed by the individual.
§132-C Powers and duties generally. (a) The office
shall:
(1) Review and assess the fire risk of the State;
(2) Coordinate fire protection efforts among local
agencies for the State;
(3) Review and propose amendments to the state fire code,
in consultation with and in consideration of
recommendations provided by the state fire council for
the state fire council's consideration in its adoption
of or amendments to the state fire code;
(4) Review the emergency resources that are available in
the State to be deployed to address fires;
(5) Work with state and county law enforcement agencies
for enforcement of the state fire code; provided that
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO

’ H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
law enforcement agencies shall have primary law
enforcement jurisdiction;
(6) Upon request of a county official having enforcement
responsibility and a showing of unusual fire hazard or
other special circumstances, investigate and make
appropriate recommendations. The state fire marshal
may investigate or cause an investigation to be made
to determine the probable cause, origin, and
circumstances of any fire and shall classify the
findings as the state fire marshal may find
appropriate to promote fire protection and prevention.
The state fire marshal shall coordinate and consult
with county authorities in the event that the state
fire marshal needs to summon witnesses related to a
fire investigation;
(7) Conduct inspections of state buildings and facilities
to ensure fire safety compliance;
(8) Oversee the training and certification of fire
inspectors and investigators in the State; and
(9) Maintain records of all fires in the State, including
the causes and circumstances.
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO


H.B. NO.
hTs
C.D. 1
(b) The office shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91
necessary to implement this part.
§132-D Discretionary powers. The office may:
(1) Establish headquarters and county offices of the
office at places the office of the governor considers
advisable for the protection of the State;
(2) Allow the state fire marshal and deputy state fire
marshals to operate authorized emergency vehicles as
defined by section 291C-1;
(3) Use land and buildings for the accommodation of office
employees and office vehicles and equipment;
(4) Contract or otherwise cooperate with any person or
public agency for the procurement of necessary
services or property, subject to chapter 103D where
applicable, including by entering into lease
agreements and taking title to real property as
necessary for the performance of the duties of the
office;
(5) As an emergency services agency, control and regulate
the acquisition, operation, use, maintenance, and
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO

IHHIHIIMIiNliim

Page 7 1064
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
disposal of, and access to, motor vehicles and
equipment for official state fire business;
(6) Accept and transfer gifts, grants, donations, and
funds from any source, including services and
property, to carry out the duties of the office;
(7) Provide training, or enter into contracts to obtain
training services, in fire suppression and fire safety
inspection, to departments and agencies that issue
licenses;
(8) Explore additional opportunities to reduce wildfire
risk, including engaging with:
(A) The insurance commissioner, as defined in section
431:2-102, regarding insurance policy coverage
provisions, underwriting standards, insurance
rates, and any other insurance-related topic
relevant to enhancing the protection of property
from wildfire at a reasonable cost;
(B) Electric utilities regarding further actions to
protect public safety, reduce risk to electric
company customers, and promote electrical system
resilience to wildfire damage; and
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO

Page 8 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(C) Federal agencies to expand opportunities for
cost-share partnerships for wildfire mitigation
and develop strategies for improvements to
federal fire management policies applicable to
the State;
(9) Oversee the development and maintenance of a
comprehensive statewide wildfire hazard map that
displays wildfire hazard zones; and
(10) Perform any other duties necessary to discharge its
duties under this part.
§132-E Preparation of statistical reports. Every two
years, the state fire marshal shall prepare statistical reports
on the history and condition of state fire defenses and an
analysis of contributing factors of fire causes for the period
of the report. The reports shall be posted on the office's
website and publicly available upon request, subject to a fee
not to exceed the cost of printing and distribution. The
reports compiled under this section shall include a compilation
or summary of the county fire chiefs' records prepared pursuant
to section 132-1 (a), in addition to any other sources the state
fire marshal deems appropriate.
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO
IIPHiMHIIliWIlinillMI

Page 9
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
§132-F Powers and duties relating to wildfire readiness.
The office shall increase the State's wildfire readiness
capacity to the extent that the office of the governor receives
funding for the increase, by means including:
(1) Increasing the number of fire prevention personnel and
fire administrative support personnel to address
planning, communications, training, deployment, and
safety;
(2) Implementing innovative technologies and modernizing
systems to expedite fire resource deployment in an
efficient and safe manner;
(3) Entering into contracts or agreements with federal or
state agencies, counties, other states, corporations,
and authorities, having jurisdiction for fire
prevention, suppression, coordination, and response;
and
(4) Coordinating with the Hawaii emergency management
agency.
§132-G Utilization of firefighting resources. The state
fire marshal, in consultation with the Hawaii emergency
management agency, shall provide advice and counsel to the
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO <
HlllilllimHIHilO

Page 10 H.B. NO.
hT2
C.D. 1
governor on the most practical utilization of the firefighting
resources of the State.
§132-H State fire marshal; terms of employment. (a) The
state fire marshal shall be the administrator of the office. If
a state fire marshal has not already been appointed by the state
fire council by June 30, 2025, as set forth in Act 209, Session
Laws of Hawaii 2024, the state fire marshal shall be appointed
by the governor from a list of three names submitted by the
state fire council. The state fire marshal shall serve for a
term of five years. The appointment of the state fire marshal
shall be made without regard to chapters 76 and 89, and shall
not be subject to the advice and consent of the senate. If a
vacancy occurs, the state fire council shall meet expeditiously
to submit a list of three names to the governor for a new state
fire marshal to serve the remainder of the unexpired term.
(b) The state fire marshal shall be qualified to direct
the technical and executive work of the office and shall have
education or training related to the programs of the office and
significant experience in managing fire protection or related
programs.
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO


Page 11 H.B. NO.
■ . . I -I . g 2
C.D. 1
§132-1 Deputies and assistants. The state fire marshal
shall appoint two deputy state fire marshals, exempt from
chapters 76 and 89, whose duties shall be to assist in
implementing this chapter. The office may also employ other
assistants and employees, subject to chapter 76, and incur other
expenses as the state fire marshal may deem necessary to
effectively administer the office. Each deputy state fire
marshal shall be well-qualified by technical training and
experience in the functions to be performed by the individual.
The state fire marshal may remove any deputy state fire marshal
for cause.
§132-J Salary. The salary of the state fire marshal and
deputy state fire marshal shall be equal to the salary of the
director and deputy director of human resources development,
respectively.
§132-K Recordkeeping. The office shall keep a record of
all fires occurring in the State and of all facts concerning the
same, including statistics as to the extent of the fires and the
damage caused, whether the losses were covered by insurance, and
if so, in what amount. All the records shall be public, except
information protected from disclosure pursuant to chapter 92F.
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO

liiiniilBllilHIIIH

Page 12 IH I .B. KN I O.
H-o-2
I . s.D.2
C.D. 1
The records compiled under this section shall be a compilation
of the county fire chiefs' records prepared pursuant to section
132-1 (a) .
§132-L Community risk reduction program. (a) The office
may develop and administer a community risk reduction program
that:
(1) Emphasizes education and methods for the prevention of
wildfire risk;
(2) Encourages cost-effective hardening and retrofitting
of structures that creates fire-resistant homes,
businesses, and public buildings; and
(3) Facilitates vegetation management, the creation and
maintenance of defensible space, and other fuel
modification activities that provide neighborhood or
community-wide benefits against wildfire.
(b) The counties may opt into the community risk reduction
program to provide resources and localized knowledge of the
community.
(c) The office or counties may contract with educational
or other nonprofit entities to assist with the administration of
the community risk reduction program.
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO 1

Page 13 H.B. NO.
-2
C.D. 1
§132-M State fire marshal; biennial report; deadline;
contents. (a) Beginning with the regular session of 2027, no
later than twenty days before the convening in each odd-numbered
year of a regular session, the office shall submit to the
legislature a report regarding the activities of the state fire
marshal and the counties in implementing this chapter.
(b) The report shall include, at a minimum:
(1) A status report concerning:
(A) Community risk reduction; and
(B) The establishment, administration, and
enforcement of defensible space requirements;
(2) The amount of moneys expended during the previous
fiscal biennium for:
(A) Community risk reduction;
(B) The establishment, administration, and
enforcement of defensible space requirements; and
(C) Fire suppression; and
(3) Any recommendations for the state fire marshal for
legislative action, including but not limited to
current or future resource and funding needs for:
(A) Community risk reduction; and
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO 1-
MWIiMUNMiillllHIlin

Page 14 H.B. NO.
hT.
I I ’I 2
C.D. 1
(B) The establishment, administration, and
enforcement of defensible space requirements.
§132-N Provision of uniforms, response apparatus, motor
vehicles, and all emergency supplies and equipment; uniform
design. (a) The office shall provide office employees with
standard uniforms, response apparatus, motor vehicles, and all
other emergency supplies and equipment necessary to carry out
the duties of the office.
(b) The state fire marshal shall specify a pattern and
distinctive design for the uniforms described in subsection (a).
(c) The state fire marshal may enter into agreements with
other governmental agencies for the purpose of resource sharing
of response apparatus, motor vehicles, and all other emergency
supplies and equipment necessary to carry out the fire safety
and prevention laws of the State.
§132-0 Minimum defensible space requirements; duties of
the state fire marshal; enforcement powers of the counties;
assistance to the counties. (a) With regard to minimum
defensible space requirements, the state fire marshal:
(1) Shall consult with the state fire council to establish
minimum defensible space requirements;
2025-3442 HB1064 GDI HMSO

imniliigiiwiiiiiiii

Page 15 H.B. NO.
h"
. g 2
1.1^. 1 'I
C.D. 1
(2) Shall establish requirements that are consistent with
and do not exceed the standards pertaining to
defensible space in generally accepted evidence-based
codes and standards;
(3) May consider best practices specific to the State and
traditional and customary practices relating to
defensible space to establish the requirements;
(4) Shall periodically reexamine generally accepted
evidence-based codes and standards and update the
requirements to reflect the current best practices,
which may be conducted in consultation with the state
fire council;
(5) Shall enforce the requirements that are applicable to
state lands within the jurisdiction of a county;
(6) Shall adopt rules governing administration of the
requirements;
(7) May develop, in consultation with the state fire
council, a graduated fine structure for the counties'
use in assessing civil penalties on property owners
for noncompliance with the requirements;
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO 15

Page 16 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(8) Shall consult with stakeholders, such as the counties,
on implementation of the requirements; and
(9) May adopt rules concerning requirements by the
counties as described in subsection (b).
(b) Each county fire chief may adopt and enforce local
requirements for defensible space that are greater than the
minimum defensible space requirements established by the state
fire marshal. Any local requirements that a county fire chief
adopts for defensible space shall be defensible space standards
selected from the framework set forth in generally accepted
evidence-based codes or standards or other best practices suited
to the State.
(c) The office may provide financial, administrative,
technical, or other assistance to a county to facilitate the
administration and enforcement of the minimum defensible space
requirements within the jurisdiction of the county. The county
shall expend financial assistance provided by the state fire
marshal under this subsection to give priority to the creation
of defensible space:
(1) On lands where members of socially and economically
vulnerable communities, persons with limited
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO 1,

Page 17 H.B. NO.
h-2
. g 2
I . . 1 'I
C.D. 1
proficiency in English, and persons of lower income
reside;
(2) For critical or emergency infrastructure; and
(3) For schools, hospitals, and facilities that serve
seniors."
SECTION 4. Chapter 132, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"§132- State fire marshal selection conimission;
established. (a) Beginning January 1, 2026, there is
established the state fire marshal selection commission, which
shall be placed within the department of law enforcement for
administrative purposes.
(b) The state fire marshal selection commission:
(1) Shall have the authority to appoint and may remove the
state fire marshal;
(2) May receive complaints from citizens on the office of
the fire marshal and the state fire marshal;
(3) Shall evaluate and conduct an annual performance
review of the state fire marshal;
(4) Shall post its agenda and minutes on a website;
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO 1

Page 18 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(5) Shall be subjected to the state sunshine laws under
chapter 92; and
(6) May adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91.
(c) The state fire marshal selection commission shall
consist of the following seven members:
(1) Three members who shall be appointed by the governor
subject to advice and consent of the senate and shall
be voting members; provided that for the initial year,
one member shall serve a one-year term, one member
shall serve a two-year term, and one member shall
serve a three-year term; provided further that after
the initial term, each of the members may serve up to
two consecutive terms for up to eight years with each
term being four years;
(2) One member who shall be appointed by the speaker of
the house and shall be a voting member; provided that
the member shall serve an initial term of four years
and may serve up to two consecutive terms for up to
eight years with each term being four years;
(3) One member who shall be appointed by the president of
the senate and shall be a voting member; provided that
2025-3442 HB1064 GDI HMSO


Page 19 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
the member shall serve an initial term of four years;
provided further that the member may serve up to two
consecutive terms for up to eight years with each term
being four years;
(4) The chair of the Hawaii state fire council or the
chair's designee, who shall be an ex officio,
nonvoting member; and
(5) The adjutant general of the Hawaii national guard or
the adjutant general's designee, who shall be an ex
officio, nonvoting member.
(d) All members of the state fire marshal selection
commission, both voting and nonvoting, shall elect a chairperson
and a vice chairperson of the commission; provided that the
chairperson is not an ex officio member.
(e) Any action taken by the state fire marshal selection
commission shall be approved by a simple majority of its
members; provided that a majority of the members of the
commission shall constitute a quorum to do business.
(f) The members of the state fire marshal selection
commission shall serve without compensation but shall be
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO


Page 20 HI .. B. NOV.
g- p2 2
C.D. 1
reimbursed for necessary expenses, including travel expenses^
reasonably incurred in the performance of their duties.
(g) Notwithstanding this section, if a state fire marshal
has already been appointed by the state fire council by June 30,
2025, as set forth in Act 209, Session Laws of Hawaii 2024, the
state fire marshal selection commission's authority to appoint
the state fire marshal shall begin upon the expiration of the
incumbent state fire marshal's term."
SECTION 5. Section 76-16, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
"(b) The civil service to which this chapter applies shall
comprise all positions in the State now existing or hereafter
established and embrace all personal services performed for the
State, except the following:
(1) Commissioned and enlisted personnel of the Hawaii
National Guard and positions in the Hawaii national
guard that are required by state or federal laws or
regulations or orders of the National Guard to be
filled from those commissioned or enlisted personnel;
(2) Positions filled by persons employed by contract where
the director of human resources development has
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO


Page 21 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
certified that the service is special or unique or is
essential to the public interest and that, because of
circumstances surrounding its fulfillment, personnel
to perform the service cannot be obtained through
normal civil service recruitment procedures. Any
contract may be for any period not exceeding one year;
(3) Positions that must be filled without delay to comply
with a court order or decree if the director
determines that recruitment through normal recruitment
civil service procedures would result in delay or
noncompliance, such as the Felix-Cayetano consent
decree;
(4) Positions filled by the legislature or by either house
or any committee thereof;
(5) Employees in the office of the governor and office of
the lieutenant governor, and household employees at
Washington Place;
(6) Positions filled by popular vote;
(7) Department heads, officers, and members of any board,
commission, or other state agency whose appointments
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO


Page 22 IH I .. B.. IN O.
. s D 2
C.D. 1
are made by the governor or are required by law to be
confirmed by the senate;
(8) Judges, referees, receivers, masters, jurors, notaries
public, land court examiners, court commissioners, and
attorneys appointed by a state court for a special
temporary service;
(9) One bailiff for the chief justice of the supreme court
who shall have the powers and duties of a court
officer and bailiff under section 606-14; one
secretary or clerk for each justice of the supreme
court, each judge of the intermediate appellate court,
and each judge of the circuit court; one secretary for
the judicial council; one deputy administrative
director of the courts; three law clerks for the chief
justice of the supreme court, two law clerks for each
associate justice of the supreme court and each judge
of the intermediate appellate court, one law clerk for
each judge of the circuit court, two additional law
clerks for the civil administrative judge of the
circuit court of the first circuit, two additional law
clerks for the criminal administrative judge of the
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO 22
WIUHBIHIIMDIHIIII

Page 23 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
circuit court of the first circuit, one additional law
clerk for the senior judge of the family court of the
first circuit, two additional law clerks for the civil
motions judge of the circuit court of the first
circuit, two additional law clerks for the criminal
motions judge of the circuit court of the first
circuit, and two law clerks for the administrative
judge of the district court of the first circuit; and
one private secretary for the administrative director
of the courts, the deputy administrative director of
the courts, each department head, each deputy or first
assistant, and each additional deputy, or assistant
deputy, or assistant defined in paragraph (16);
(10) First deputy and deputy attorneys general, the
administrative services manager of the department of
the attorney general, one secretary for the
administrative services manager, an administrator and
any support staff for the criminal and juvenile
justice resources coordination functions, and law
clerks;
2025-3442 HB1064 GDI HMSO


Page 24 H.B. NO. S
C.D. 1
(11) (A) Teachers, principals, vice-principals, complex
area superintendents, deputy and assistant
superintendents, other certificated personnel,
and no more than twenty noncertificated
administrative, professional, and technical
personnel not engaged in instructional work;
(B) Effective July 1, 2003, teaching assistants,
educational assistants, bilingual or bicultural
school-home assistants, school psychologists,
psychological examiners, speech pathologists,
athletic health care trainers, alternative school
work study assistants, alternative school
educational or supportive services specialists,
alternative school project coordinators, and
communications aides in the department of
education;
(C) The special assistant to the state librarian and
one secretary for the special assistant to the
state librarian; and
(D) Members of the faculty of the [Jn,!ver-sity]
university of Hawaii, including research workers.
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO


Page 25 H.B. NO.
-2
C.D. 1
extension agents, personnel engaged in
instructional work, and administrative,
professional, and technical personnel of the
university;
(12) Employees engaged in special, research, or
demonstration projects approved by the governor;
(13) (A) Positions filled by inmates, patients of state
institutions, and persons with severe physical or
mental disabilities participating in the work
experience training programs;
(B) Positions filled with students in accordance with
guidelines for established state employment
programs; and
(C) Positions that provide work experience training
or temporary public service employment that are
filled by persons entering the workforce or
persons transitioning into other careers under
programs such as the federal Workforce Investment
Act of 1998, as amended, or the Senior Community
Service Employment Program of the Employment and
Training Administration of the United States
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO 2'

Page 26 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
Department of Labor, or under other similar state
programs;
(14) A custodian or guide at lolani Palace, the Royal
Mausoleum, and Hulihee Palace;
(15) Positions filled by persons employed on a fee,
contract, or piecework basis, who may lawfully perform
their duties concurrently with their private business
or profession or other private employment and whose
duties require only a portion of their time, if it is
impracticable to ascertain or anticipate the portion
of time to be devoted to the service of the State;
(16) Positions of first deputies or first assistants of
each department head appointed under or in the manner
provided in section 6, article V, of the Hawaii State
Constitution; three additional deputies or assistants
either in charge of the highways, harbors, and
airports divisions or other functions within the
department of transportation as may be assigned by the
director of transportation, with the approval of the
governor; one additional deputy in the department of
human services either in charge of welfare or other
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO 2

Page 27
H.B. NO. '
C.D. 1
functions within the department as may be assigned by
the director of human services; four additional
deputies in the department of health, each in charge
of one of the following: behavioral health,
environmental health, hospitals, and health resources
administration, including other functions within the
department as may be assigned by the director of
health, with the approval of the governor; two
additional deputies in charge of the law enforcement
programs, administration, or other functions within
the department of law enforcement as may be assigned
by the director of law enforcement, with the approval
of the governor; three additional deputies each in
charge of the correctional institutions,
rehabilitation services and programs, and
administration or other functions within the
department of corrections and rehabilitation as may be
assigned by the director of corrections and
rehabilitation, with the approval of the governor; two
administrative assistants to the state librarian; and
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO


Page 28 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
an administrative assistant to the superintendent of
education;
(17) Positions specifically exempted from this part by any
other law; provided that:
(A) Any exemption created after July 1, 2014, shall
expire three years after its enactment unless
affirmatively extended by an act of the
legislature; and
(B) All of the positions defined by paragraph (9)
shall be included in the position classification
plan;
(18) Positions in the state foster grandparent program and
positions for temporary employment of senior citizens
in occupations in which there is a severe personnel
shortage or in special projects;
(19) Household employees at the official residence of the
president of the [University] university of Hawaii;
(20) Employees in the department of education engaged in
the supervision of students during meal periods in the
distribution, collection, and counting of meal
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO 28
WIHillllllillHHHI

Page 29 H.B. NO.
hT2
C.D. 1
tickets, and in the cleaning of classrooms after
school hours on a less than half-time basis;
(21) Employees hired under the tenant hire program of the
Hawaii public housing authority; provided that no more
than twenty-six per cent of the authority's workforce
in any housing project maintained or operated by the
authority shall be hired under the tenant hire
program;
(22) Positions of the federally funded expanded food and
nutrition program of the [Un-ivcrsity] university of
Hawaii that require the hiring of nutrition program
assistants who live in the areas they serve;
(23) Positions filled by persons with severe disabilities
who are certified by the state vocational
rehabilitation office that they are able to perform
safely the duties of the positions;
(24) The sheriff;
(25) A gender and other fairness coordinator hired by the
judiciary;
(26) Positions in the Hawaii National Guard youth and adult
education programs;
2025-3442 HB1064 GDI HMSO

iiiinniiMiiiDHiiiiM

Page 30 HI .. Bi-X .. NO.
g 2
C.D. 1
(27) In the Hawaii state energy office in the department of
business, economic development, and tourism, all
energy program managers, energy program specialists,
energy program assistants, and energy analysts;
(28) Administrative appeals hearing officers in the
department of human services;
(29) In the Med-QUEST division of the department of human
services, the division administrator, finance officer,
health care services branch administrator, medical
director, and clinical standards administrator;
(30) In the director's office of the department of human
services, the enterprise officer, information security
and privacy compliance officer, security and privacy
compliance engineer, security and privacy compliance
analyst, information technology implementation
manager, assistant information technology
implementation manager, resource manager, community or
project development director, policy director, special
assistant to the director, and limited English
proficiency project manager or coordinator;
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO


Page 31 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(31) The Alzheimer's disease and related dementia services
coordinator in the executive office on aging;
(32) In the Hawaii emergency management agency, the
executive officer, public information officer, civil
defense administrative officer, branch chiefs, and
emergency operations center state warning point
personnel; provided that for state warning point
personnel, the director shall determine that
recruitment through normal civil service recruitment
procedures would result in delay or noncompliance;
(33) The executive director and seven full-time
administrative positions of the school facilities
authority;
(34) Positions in the Mauna Kea stewardship and oversight
authority;
(35) In the office of homeland security of the department
of law enforcement, the statewide interoperable
communications coordinator;
(36) In the social services division of the department of
human services, the business technology analyst;
(37) The executive director and staff of the 911 board;
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO

Page 32 H.B. NO 1064
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
[-{-] (38) [-}-] Senior software developers in the department of
taxation;
[-{•] (39) [-}-] In the department of law enforcement, five Commission
on Accreditation for Law Enforcement Agencies, Inc.,
coordinator positions;
[+1 (40) [-3-] The state fire marshal [-^] and deputy state fire
marshal in the office of the state fire marshal; and
[+1 (41) [-]-] The administrator for the law enforcement standards
board.
The director shall determine the applicability of this
section to specific positions.
Nothing in this section shall be deemed to affect the civil
service status of any incumbent as it existed on July 1, 1955."
SECTION 6. Section 132-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§132-1 County fire chiefs; powers and duties. (a)
Records. The fire chief of each county shall keep in the county
fire chief's office a record of all fires occurring in the
county and of all facts concerning the same, and shall make
[eu-eh-] compilations and statistical investigations [as—the- fire
ehie^-aftay—deefft-^reper^] on an annual basis, all of which shall
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO


Page 33 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
be kept as permanent records in the fire chief's office. All
records shall be public, except that any evidence in any
investigation may, in the discretion of the county fire chief,
be withheld from the public.
(b) Investigations, generally. The fire chief of each
county shall:
(1) Investigate the cause, origin, and circumstances of
fires;
(2) Supervise and make or cause to be made [periodically]
on a biennial basis, a thorough inspection record of
all property [whieh] that might constitute a fire
hazard within the county [-t-] pursuant to subsection
(c) ;
(3) Summon and compel the attendance of witnesses and
production of evidence and hold hearings and make
orders in any matter under the fire chief's
jurisdiction; ar^
(4) Cooperate with [any and] all other governmental
officers or agencies having jurisdiction in the
matters.
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO 33

Page 34 1064
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
(c) On January 1 of each year, the fire chief of each
county shall transmit the records and statistical investigations
compiled pursuant to subsection (a) to the office of the state
fire marshal. On January 1 of each alternating year, the fire
chief of each county shall transmit the inspection record of
property that may constitute a fire hazard within their county
compiled pursuant to subsection (b)(2) to the office of the
state fire marshal."
SECTION 7. Section 132-4, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§132-4 Investigation of fires; criminal prosecutions.
The fire chief of the county in which any fire occurs shall
immediately investigate the cause, origin, and circumstances of
fire by which property has been destroyed or damaged and so far
as possible determine whether the fire was the result of
carelessness or design. A county fire chief may request the
office of the state fire marshal to assist with the
investigation of a fire as provided in section 132-C.
If after any investigation the county fire chief is of the
opinion that the evidence in relation to the fire indicates that
a crime has been committed, the fire chief shall present the
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO

MMHIiUniHIIIH

Page 35 H.B. NO.
hT2
C.D. 1
evidence to the prosecuting [e#^iee^] attorney of the county in
which the supposed offense was committed, with the request that
the prosecuting attorney institute [sueh] criminal
proceedings as the evidence may warrant,
If the office of the state fire marshal is of the opinion
that the evidence in relation to a fire indicates that a crime
has been committed, the office of the state fire marshal shall
coordinate with the relevant county fire chief to present the
evidence to the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the
supposed offense was committed.”
SECTION 8. Section 132-4.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [-tl§132-4.5 [•]-] Investigation of fires; immunity for
information received from insurers. (a) The fire chief of each
county or the state fire marshal may require any insurer in
writing to release information relating to any investigation the
insurer has made concerning a loss or potential loss due to fire
of suspicious or incendiary origin which information shall
include but not be limited to:
(1) An insurance policy relating to [eaeh] the loss;
(2) Policy premium records;
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO


Page 36
H.B. NO. '
C.D. 1
(3) History of previous claims; and
(4) Other relevant material relating to [eaefe] th^ loss or
potential loss.
(b) If any insurer has reason to suspect that a fire loss
to its insured's real or personal property was caused by
incendiary means, the insurer shall furnish the county fire
chief or state fire marshal with all relevant material acquired
during its investigation of the fire loss, cooperate with and
take action as may be required of it by the county fire
chief [7-] or state fire marshal, and permit any person ordered by
the court to inspect any of its records pertaining to the policy
and the loss. [S«eh] The insurer may request the county fire
chief or state fire marshal to release information relating to
any investigation the fire chief or state fire marshal has made
concerning any [such] fire loss of suspicious or incendiary
origin.
(c) In the absence of fraud, malice, or criminal act, no
insurer or person who furnishes information on its behalf, shall
be liable for damages in a civil action or be subject to
criminal prosecution for any oral or written statement made that
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO

MiiiiiimiiiiMinii

Page 37 H.B. NO.
hT.
C.D. 1
is necessary to supply information required pursuant to this
section.
(d) The county fire chief or state fire marshal receiving
any information furnished pursuant to this section shall hold
the information in confidence until [such time a&] its release
is required in furtherance of a criminal or civil proceeding.
(e) The county fire chief, in person or by officers or
members of the fire chief's fire department, or the state fire
marshal, in person or by deputies or employees of the office of
the state fire marshal, may be required to testify as to any
information in the fire chief's or state fire marshal's
possession regarding the fire loss of real or personal property
in any civil action in which any person seeks recovery under a
policy against any insurance company for the fire loss."
SECTION 9. Section 132-5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§132-5 Right of entry for inspection; unlawful to
obstruct. The county fire chief the chief's designees,
the state fire marshal, or the state fire marshal's designees,
at all reasonable hours may enter any buildings, structures, or
premises within the fire chief's or state fire marshal's
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO

■HiwiimiiBiinMi

Page 38 H.B. NO.
hT2
C.D. 1
jurisdiction, respectively, except the interior of private
dwellings, to make any inspection, investigation, or examination
that is authorized to be made under this chapter. The county
fire chief the chief’s designees, the state fire marshal,
or the state fire marshal's designees may enter any private
dwelling whenever the fire chief the chief's designees2_
the state fire marshal, or the state fire marshal's designees
have reason to believe that dangerous conditions creating a fire
hazard exist in the dwelling. The county fire chief the
chief's designees, the state fire marshal, or the state fire
marshal's designees may enter any private dwelling when a fire
has occurred in the dwelling. It shall be unlawful to obstruct,
hinder, or delay any person having the right to make the
inspection, investigation, or examination in the performance of
duty.
The county fire chief the chief's designees [a^re
authorized t-o make an inspection of], the state fire marshal, or
the state fire marshal's designees may inspect all buildings and
facilities, except state-owned airport facilities, the frequency
of which shall be made in accordance with section 132-6, and
shall make a report to the authorities responsible for the
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO

Hnunwnniim^^^

Page 39 H.B. NO. S
C.D. 1
maintenance of any building or facility when it is found that a
building or facility does not meet minimum standards of fire and
safety protection."
SECTION 10. Section 132-6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§132-6 Duties of county fire chiefs; periodic
inspections; orders to remove fire hazards; appeals. (a) Each
county fire chief, in person or by officers or members of the
fire chief's fire department designated by the fire chief for
that purpose, shall inspect all buildings, premises, and public
thoroughfares, except the interiors of private dwellings and
[otatc-owned■ ai-rport] state facilities, for the purpose of
ascertaining and causing to be corrected any conditions liable
to cause fire or any violation of any law, ordinance, rule, or
order relating to fire hazard or to the prevention of fires.
(b) The inspection shall be made [-h
At loaot once each year at -all public scheol-s;-and
42-)- Ad] least once every five years, or as often as
deemed practicable or necessary by the county fire
chief_^ at all other buildings and premises to provide
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO

lliniMiNIUMMIMII

Page 40 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
fire prevention and pre-fire planning within the
jurisdiction of the county fire chief.
The [State] office of the state fire marshal shall conduct fire
and safety inspections at all [statc-owned-airport] state
facilities at least once a year.
(c) A written report of each inspection shall be kept on
file in the office of the county fire chief.
(d) A copy of any report showing a change in the hazard or
any violation of law, ordinance, rule_^ or order relating to the
fire hazard upon any risk, shall be given by the county fire
chief to any rating bureau making written request of the fire
chief therefor.
(e) Each county fire chief [is] shall be vested with the
power and jurisdiction over, and shall have supervision of,
every building and premises in the county as may be necessary to
enforce any law, ordinances, rule_^ and order relating to
protection from fire loss; provided that this provision shall
not in any manner limit the jurisdiction or authority [whieh]
that any other county official may have over [sueh] the building
or premises under any other law or ordinance. Whenever as a
result of inspection or upon complaint or otherwise the county
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO 40
HIWIHHIliMmill

Page 41 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
fire chief determines that a law, ordinance, rule2_ or order
relating to protection from fire loss has been violated or.that
a condition exists [which] that creates an unreasonable risk of
fire loss, the fire chief shall prepare and serve upon the
owner, occupant,^ or other person responsible for the building or
premises a written order setting forth the nature of the alleged
violation or condition, the law, ordinance, rule, or order
violated, and the protections, safeguards, or other means or
methods required to render the building or premises safe as
required by law, ordinance, or rule. The order shall be
complied with by the owner or occupant or person responsible for
the building or premises within the time therein specified
unless a timely appeal is taken pursuant to subsection (f) [ef-
thio ooet-ion] .
(f) Owner’s appeal to county fire appeals board. The
owner or occupant may, within five days, appeal from any order
made by the county fire chief to the county fire appeals board,
which shall, within thirty days, and after a hearing pursuant to
chapter 91, review the order and file its decision thereon,
modifying, affirming, or revoking the order. Each county shall
2025-3442 HB1064 GDI HMSO

WMillHIilHIim

Page 42 H.B. NO. 1064
H.D.2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
by ordinance establish a county fire appeals board and shall
provide for its composition.
(g) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (e) [ef^
thio section] where the county fire chief determines that a
clear and immediate risk of fire loss exists, the fire chief
may2_ after notice to the owner or occupant or other person
responsible for the building or premises, and after a hearing
pursuant to chapter 91, order [ettefe-] tl^ person to take all
actions reasonably necessary to render the building or premises
safe from fire loss; provided that no notice or hearing shall be
required where the county fire chief determines that the risk of
fire loss is sufficiently immediate that delay would be
dangerous to the public safety and welfare. If any owner,
occupant2_ or other person responsible for the building or
premises fails to comply with the order of the county fire
chief, the county fire chief may take [s«ehr] action and make
[■&ueh:] any expenditure as may be necessary and if the owner,
occupant, or other person responsible neglects or refuses to pay
to the county fire chief the expense incurred by the fire chief,
the county shall have a prior lien on the real property as
provided for in section 132-7."
2025-3442 HB1064 GDI HMSO 42
■iniliHIIMIIH

Page 43 HI .. B.. N'I OV.
g p 2
C.D. 1
SECTION 11. Section 132-10, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§132-10 Witnesses; fees. The county fire appeals board
the county fire chief, or the state fire marshal shall in
all proceedings have the same powers respecting administering
oaths, compelling the attendance of witnesses and the production
of documentary evidence, and examining witnesses as are
possessed by circuit courts. In case of disobedience by any
person of any order of the county fire appeals board the
county fire chief, or the state fire marshal or of any subpoena
issued by ai^ of them or of the refusal of any witness
to testify to any matter regarding which the witness may be
questioned lawfully, any circuit judge, on application by the
county corporation counsel, shall compel obedience as in case of
disobedience of all requirements of a subpoena issued from a
circuit court or a refusal to testify therein. The fees and
traveling expenses of witnesses shall be the same as are allowed
witnesses in the circuit courts and shall be paid by the
appropriate county out of any appropriation or funds available
for the expenses of the county fire chief[—] or, in the case of
a summons by the state fire marshal, shall be paid out of any
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO 4

Page 44
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
appropriation or funds available for the expenses of the state
fire marshal.”
SECTION 12. Section 132-11, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§132-11 Recorded order of county fire chiefs and state
fire marshal as evidence. A duplicate original of every order
made by each county fire chief shall be filed in the fire
chief's office2_ and [etjeh] a duplicate original of every order
made by the state fire marshal shall be filed in the office of
the state fire marshal. A duplicate original shall be
admissible as evidence in any prosecution for the violation of
any of its provisions. Unless an appeal has been instituted and
is pending, the provisions of any order shall be presumed to be
reasonable and lawful and to fix a reasonable and proper
standard and requirement of safety from fire loss."
SECTION 13. Section 132-12, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§132-12 Court aid. Each county fire chief or the state
fire marshal may invoke the aid of any court of competent
jurisdiction to enforce any order or action made or taken by the
fire chief or state fire marshal in pursuance of law."
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO 4,
■iiniiiyiiiNHHB

Page 45 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
SECTION 14. Section 132-13, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§132-13 Penalty. Any owner, occupant, or other person
having control over or charge of any building, structure, or
other premises who violates any provision of this chapter or any
law, ordinance, or rule relating to protection from fire loss or
who fails or refuses to comply with any order of the county fire
chief or any order of the state fire marshal shall be fined no
more than $2,500 or imprisoned no more than thirty days, or
both. Each day that a violation exists or continues to exist
shall constitute a distinct and separate offense for which the
violator may be punished. Penalties for continuing violations
shall be assessed from the earliest known date of the violation.
In addition to the penalty imposed under this section, counties
may assess and collect civil penalties based on the penalty
structure set forth by the state fire marshal pursuant to
section 132-0,"
SECTION 15. Section 132-16, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsections (a) through (c) to read as
follows:
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO


Page 46 H.B. NO.
^0^
C.D. 1
" (a) There [i-&] shall be established a state fire council,
which shall be placed within the department of [labor and
induatrial-relat-i-ono] law enforcement for administrative
purposes. The state fire council shall consist of the state
fire marshal, the fire chiefs of the counties, the fire chief of
the Hawaii state aircraft rescue fire fighting unit, and a
representative of the division of forestry and wildlife of the
department of land and natural resources. The state fire
council may appoint an advisory committee to assist it in
carrying out its functions under this chapter. The advisory
committee may include the heads of the various county building
departments, a licensed architect recommended by the Hawaii
Society of the American Institute of Architects, a licensed
electrical engineer and a licensed mechanical engineer
recommended by the Consulting Engineers Council of Hawaii, a
representative of the Hawaii Rating Bureau, a representative of
the Hawaii Fire Fighters Association, representatives of the
county fire departments, a representative of the Hawaii state
aircraft rescue fire fighting unit, a representative of the
division of forestry and wildlife of the department of land and
natural resources, and other members of the public as the state
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO

WMIWiWiMllffllHilllll

Page 47 H.B. NO.
hT2
C.D. 1
fire council may determine can best assist it. The state fire
council shall elect a chairperson from among its members.
(b) In addition to adopting a state fire code pursuant to
section 132-3, the state fire council shall:
(1) Administer the requirements for reduced ignition
propensity cigarettes, in accordance with chapter
132C;
(2) Serve as a focal point through which all applications
to the federal government for federal grant assistance
for fire-related projects shall be made. Upon the
receipt of any [ouch] federal grants, the state fire
council shall administer those federal grants;
[-UH- Estah-lish the termo- of- employment for the peoitien -ef
the state- fire-marshal,•—and
-(-4h Appoint- t-he-state fire marohal. ]
(3) Advise the governor and state fire marshal on fire
policy issues and serve in an advisory capacity to the
state fire marshal on strategies for the
implementation of fire and life safety issues; and
(4) Coordinate with the state building code council on
matters pertaining to fire safety.
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO

Page 48 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
The state fire council may also:
Appoint advisory committees comprising representatives
from each county fire department, a representative of
the Hawaii state aircraft rescue fire fighting unit,
and a representative of the division of forestry and
wildlife of the department of land and natural
resources to assist in drafting the state fire code
and coordinating statewide training, data collection.
and contingency planning needs for firefighters;
(2) Advise and assist the county and state fire
departments where appropriate; may prescribe standard
procedures and forms relating to inspections.
investigations, and reporting of fires; may approve
plans for cooperation among the county and state fire
departments; and may advise the governor and the
legislature with respect to fire prevention and
protection, life safety. and any other functions or
activities for which the various county and state fire
departments are generally responsible; [eftd]
Establish, in conformance with the adopted state fire
code and nationally recognized standards, statewide
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO


Page 49 H.B. NO.
^0-
C.D. 1
qualifications and procedures, to be administered by
the county fire departments, for testing, certifying,
and credentialing individuals who perform maintenance
and testing of portable fire extinguishers,
water-based fire protection systems, other fire
protection systems, private fire hydrants, and fire
alarm systems; provided that the county fire
departments may establish and charge reasonable
certification fees[—]£
(4) Review any conflicts that may arise in the adoption,
amendment, or implementation of the state fire codes
at the state and county levels or in the adoption,
amendment, or implementation of rules proposed or
adopted by the office or the counties pursuant to this
chapter; and
(5) The state fire council may adopt rules pursuant to
chapter 91 for purposes of this section."
SECTION 16. Section 291C-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending the definition of "authorized emergency
vehicle" to read as follows:
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO 49
■miHHHIlH

Page 50 H.B. NO.
hT2
C.D. 1
""Authorized emergency vehicle" includes fire department
vehicles, police vehicles, ambulances, ocean safety vehicles,
law enforcement vehicles, [and] conservation and resources
enforcement vehicles, and office of the state fire marshal
vehicles authorized and approved pursuant to section 291-31.5
that are publicly owned and other publicly or privately owned
vehicles designated as such by a county council."
SECTION 17. Section 132-16.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
repealed.
["[§132-16.5]—Office-of-the state fire marshal;
established.-- (-a-)-- There—is cstafoliohed ^o office of the state
fire marshal within—the departmc-n-t-ef-labor and-indast-ri-al
rolations-.--The e-ffice-shal-l be headed-by a state fire marshal,
who-shall bo appointed by t-hc state fire oounoil to servo for a
term-of five yea-rs-.--The appointment of the state fire marshal-
shall be -made without -regard to oha-ptors 76 and -8-9,—and -shall
not-bo- subject—to—the advice and eonsent of- the senate.-- In- the
evon-t o-f a vacancy,—the sta-to -f-iro -eou-ncil -shall—mee-t
expeditiously to select and-appoint- a-new state fire marshal to
sorv-e the rcmainder-e-f- the unexpired- term.--The- -state-fire
marshal-maydiire staff—as noccosaary.
2025-3442 HB1064 GDI HMSO

■liiiHHnHm

Page 51 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
-- ¥h€—state-far-ro ma3?-shaj^--shalj." ■have the qualifioati-ons/
e^^esareftee-T—an-d-export i sc in fire-safety/—preveftfeieftT—aftd
control necessary to succcosfully perform- the duties- of the
pooition-7-
- (-e^-- The -duties of the state fire marshal shall include—but
not be limited to^-
- (-11- Coor-di-nating fire profeoetlon efforts between loeal
agenei-eo- for the--State-;
- (-3-}- Work-ing with the state fire council on matters
rcla-ting to -fi-ro-- services -in- the- State;
- (-3-1 Wo-rk-lng wi-th- state and- eounty-law -enforcement agencies
for cn-foroement of t-hc state fire code;
- Hl Rcviow-lng and aoscssl-ng--the -fire-risk -of- t-he State;
- (-§-1 Rev-lew-ing^ a-nd proposing amendments-t-e-the state ^Ire
eodo-and submitt-lng the proposed^amendment-s -to the
state f-irc- coune-il for—the state f-ir-e -eouneil'-s
eon-sideration- -in- its—adoption of- or -amendments to -the
state firc-Godc;
- (-61 -Reviewing- the emergency rcso-urcos that arc available
in-the-State le be -deployed to a-ddress—-fires-^
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO

■miwMNBiiwnn

Page 52 H.B. NO.
hT2
C.D. 1
4-?-)- Asso-ssing wfecthor tho-S-fca-tc would benefit from a
otat-ewido public fire aafoty mGasagir>g program;
4-8-)- Asoisting in the invcGtigation o-f—fires—when requeoted
by a ceunty-;-
4-94- Conductring ■inspee-t-ions—af—state buildings and
facilities de-ensure f^i-rc -safety Gomp-liancch;-
(10) Providingandcoordinating publiccducadion—and
Qwa-rencss on- fire safety;
(11) Overseei-ng the training and certification o-f fire
inspootors and -i-nve&tigatoro in the State;
-(12)- Maintaining—records of all fi-rcs-in dhe State,
including the causes and Gircumstanoos;
(13)- Assisting in-the dis-bursement—of-federal grants for
structural fire protection purposes to the counties;
and
4i-4) Perferming other duties as neecsoary or delegated by
dhe—adade—dia?e—eennei4-r
-(d4-- In-co-rrying out the duties of this section,—the state
■fire marshal may utilize the servicee' of the state fire ce-uncil,
including ids advisory cofftmittoes and administrative staff,—aa
apprepriade-:-" ]
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO


Page 53 H.B. NO.
I . s D 2
C.D. 1
SECTION 18. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $2,212,000 or so much
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the
same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year
2026-2027 in the following manner:
(1) For fiscal year 2025-2026:
(A) $206,352 for one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE)
position for the state fire marshal;
(B) $189,804 for one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE)
position for one deputy state fire marshal;
(C) $40,248 for one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE)
position for one office assistant IV;
(D) $160,000 for two full-time equivalent (2.0 FTE)
positions for fire inspectors;
(E) $240,000 for three full-time equivalent (3.0 FTE)
positions for fire investigators; and
(F) $1,375,596 for the operations, costs, equipment,
and expenses of the office of the state fire
marshal; and
(2) For fiscal year 2026-2027:
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO
niiiiHiiwmnni 53

Page 54 H.B. NO.
hT.
C.D. 1
(A) $214,608 for one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE)
position for the state fire marshal;
(B) $197,400 for one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE)
position for one deputy state fire marshal;
(C) $40,248 for one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE)
position for one office assistant IV;
(D) $160,000 for two full-time equivalent (2.0 FTE)
positions for fire inspectors;
(E) $240,000 for three full-time equivalent (3.0 FTE)
positions for fire investigators; and
(F) $1,359,744 for the operations, costs, equipment,
and expenses of the office of the state fire
marshal.
The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department
of law enforcement for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 19. Notwithstanding the establishment of the state
fire marshal selection commission on January 1, 2026, pursuant
to the new section being added to chapter 132, Hawaii Revised
Statutes, in section 4 of this Act, the term of employment of
any person occupying the state fire marshal position on January
1, 2026, shall not be affected.
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO

■iilliHIMIfflHHHIIII

Page 55 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
SECTION 20. In codifying the new sections added by
section 2 of this Act, the revisor of statutes shall substitute
appropriate section numbers for the letters used in designating
the new sections in this Act.
SECTION 21. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 22. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
2025-3442 HB1064 CDl HMSO

inniiiiniiiiwm

H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
APPROVED this sth day of July , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1064, HD 2, SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date; April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
—-
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1064, H.D. 2, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai'i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
178